Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2215.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-52,167 is hereby amended to
read as follows: 75-52,167. As used in K.S.A. 75-3739, and
amendments thereto, and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-52,167 through 75-
52,171, and amendments thereto:
(a) "Private entity" means any partnership, firm, association,
corporation, sole proprietorship or other business organization, whether
organized for profit or not-for-profit and includes any faith-based
organization.
(b) "Secretary" means the secretary of corrections.
(c) "Public-private partnership" means the relationship established
between the department of corrections and a private entity by
contracting for the performance of any combination of specified
functions or responsibilities to develop, finance, construct or renovate a
building at a correctional institution where the department of
corrections cost for development, finance, construction or renovation of
such building does not exceed 25% 50% of the total cost of the
developing, financing, constructing or renovating such building.
(d) "Correctional institution" means the same as defined in K.S.A.
75-5202, and amendments thereto.
(e) "Public-private project" means the project to develop, finance,
construct or renovate a building at a correctional institution pursuant to
a public-private partnership.
(f) "Faith-based organization" means any religious, charitable or
other organization described in article 17 of chapter 17 of the Kansas
Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto, or any other organization
whose values are based on faith and beliefs, or both, that has a mission
based on social values of the particular faith and whose members are
from a particular faith group.
(g) "Spiritual needs" means any program or service that addresses
any issue related to sincerely held religious beliefs.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-52,167 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above Bill originated in the House, and passed
that body
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
______________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
__________________________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.